Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8061.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-25-14 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-25 entitled "Jails and
Prisons" is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-25-14. Conveyance of unauthorized articles to or from institutions Conveyance of
unauthorized articles to or from institutions or the training school for youth.
(a) Every person who shall convey or cause to be conveyed into the adult correctional
institutions any article without first obtaining the consent of the director of corrections, or who shall
convey from the institutions any article without the consent of the director of corrections, shall be
punished, upon conviction, by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, or by a fine of not
more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.
(b) Every person who shall convey or cause to be conveyed to any prisoner any drugs,
tobacco or any article that could be used as a weapon, without first obtaining the consent of the
director of corrections, may be punished, upon conviction, by imprisonment for not more than ten
(10) years, or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.
(c) For the purposes of subsection (b), “prisoner” includes all persons committed to the
adult correctional institution, in the custody of the warden, in the custody of any other officer while
outside the confines of the custodial unit, in the custody of the state director of behavioral
healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals pursuant to § 40.1-5.3-1, regardless of whether
that prisoner is held upon conviction or upon any criminal charge. “Prisoner” shall not include
persons on home confinement.

(d) Every person who shall convey or cause to be conveyed to any resident at the training
school for youth, any drugs, tobacco, portable electronic communication device, or any article that
could be used as a weapon, without first obtaining the consent of the executive director of the
division of youth development at the department of children, youth and families, may be punished,
upon conviction, by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, or by a fine of not more than
five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.
(e) For the purposes of subsection (d) of this section, “resident” includes all persons
detained at the training school for youth, in the custody of the superintendent of the training school
for youth, in the custody of any other juvenile program worker while outside the confines of the
custodial unit, or in the custody of the state director of behavioral healthcare, developmental
disabilities and hospitals pursuant to § 40.1-5.3-1, regardless of whether that person is held upon
adjudication or upon any petition for delinquency or waywardness. “Resident” shall not include
persons on home confinement.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005363
========
LC005363 - Page 2 of 3